Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1189.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5304. Indiscriminate arrest.(a) Offense.--A law enforcement officer commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the officer knowingly or recklessly arrests or detains a person indiscriminately so as to interfere substantially with a person's liberty.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Indiscriminate." Using a person's race, nationality or immigration status as a basis for arrest or detention without a warrant when no probable cause of an immigration violation 123456789101112131415161718 exists. The term includes arresting or detaining individuals without a warrant in order to meet a quota."Law enforcement officer." The term includes:(1) Federal law enforcement officials.(2) Peace officers as the term is defined in section 501 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1189PN1460 - 2 - 1234567